Wyoming, session 2025, HB0206.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(B)(intro) is
amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

HB0206

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0569
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxxix) "Acceptable identification" means:

(B) For purposes of in person voter
identification immediately before voting at a polling place
or absentee polling place, any of the following, provided
that the identification includes a photograph of the
person:

Section 2. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(B)(VIII) and (IX)
is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0206